Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.125

Open collection of educational resources—Inclusive curricula.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the statewide association of educational service districts, the legislative youth advisory council established under RCW 43.15.095, and the Washington state school directors' association, must create an open collection of educational resources for inclusive curricula. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must consult with the Washington state office of equity established in RCW 43.06D.020 and any other relevant state agencies when creating the open collection of educational resources.

(2) The open collection of educational resources must include resources that include the histories, contributions, and perspectives of historically marginalized and underrepresented groups.

[ 2024 c 157 s 5.]